Hawaii, session 2026, GM1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. Chapter 9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by amending the title of part II to read as follows:
"PART II. [FOUNDATION] GRANT [PROGRAM] PROGRA^"
SECTION 2. Section 9-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-{•] §9“11 [Tl Qualifying standards for [foundation] grant
applications. An applicant for a foundation grant or performing
arts grants program grant shall meet the following standards:
(1) If the applicant is an organization:
(A) Be a for-profit organization incorporated under
the laws of the State or a nonprofit organization
exempt from the federal income tax by the
Internal Revenue Service;
(B) In the case of a tax exempt nonprofit
organization, the organization shall have a
governing board whose members have no material
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

inminHiiiiiiwiii

Page 2 1815
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
conflict of interest and serve without
compensation;
(C) Have bylaws or policies that describe the manner
in which business is conducted, prohibit
nepotism, and provide for the management of
potential conflict of interest situations; and
(D) Have at least one year's experience with the
project or in the program or activity area for
which the request for grant is being made;
provided that the foundation may grant an
exception where the requesting or proposing
organization has demonstrated the necessary
experience in the program area[—]; or
(2) If the applicant is an individual, the applicant must
be determined by the foundation to be:
(A) Professionally recognized in the field of culture
and the arts or history and the humanities; and
(B) Qualified to carry out the activity or program
proposed for delivery to the general public or
specified members of the general public."
2026-3210 HB1815 GDI HMSO

iiiiiiniiiiiiiiimHiiiHii

Page 3 1815
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. Section 9-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t]§9“12 [^] Conditions for [foundation] grants.
Applicants to whom a grant, including a performing arts grants
program grant, has been awarded shall agree to comply with the
following conditions before receiving the grant:
(1) Be, employ, or have under contract persons who are
qualified to engage in the program or activity to be
funded by the State; provided that for nonprofit
organizations, no two or more members of a family or
kin of the first or second degree shall be employed or
under contract by the organization unless specifically
permitted in writing by the foundation;
(2) Comply with applicable federal and state laws
prohibiting discrimination against any person on the
basis of race, color, national origin, religion,
creed, sex, age, or physical handicap;
(3) Agree not to use public funds for purposes of
entertainment or perquisites;
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO
■miniiiiiiHiH

Page 4
H.B. NO. g’i
C.D. 1
(4) Comply with other requirements as the foundation may
prescribe to ensure adherence to federal, state, and
county laws by the grant recipient; and
(5) Allow the foundation, the legislative bodies, and the
legislative auditor full access to records, reports,
files, and other related documents so that the
program, management, and fiscal practices of the grant
recipient may be monitored and evaluated to assure the
proper and effective expenditure of public funds."
SECTION 4. Section 9-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending its title and subsections (a) and (b) to
read:
"§9-13 Required review of req[uests for [fouedatien]
grants. (a) Every request for a foundation grant or performing
arts grants program grant shall be reviewed in accordance with
this section.
(b) Every request for a foundation grant or performing
arts grants program grant shall be submitted to the foundation
on an application form provided by the foundation. Each
application shall contain:
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO
IMIIIMHHIIIinilill

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) A statement of the purpose of the activity or program
to be funded by the grant;
(2) A written description of the activity or program;
(3) Financial information regarding the activity or
program;
(4) If the applicant is an organization, personnel
position salaries; and
(5) Any other information the foundation requires."
2. By amending subsection (e) to read:
"(e) The foundation shall inform each foundation grant or
performing arts grants program grant applicant of the
disposition of the application's request."
SECTION 5. Section 9-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-tl§9-14 [^] Allotment. Appropriations for foundation
grants or performing arts grants program grants to be made under
this chapter shall be subject to the allotment system generally
applicable to all appropriations made by the legislature."
SECTION 6. Section 9-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

IHlIilllNHIliniUlill

Page 6 T,
H.B. NO. h
C.D. 1
"(a) The foundation shall not release the public funds
approved for a foundation grant or performing arts grants
program grant unless a contract is entered into between the
foundation and the recipient of the grant. The foundation shall
develop and determine, in consultation with and subject to the
review and approval of the attorney general, the specific
contract form to be used."
SECTION 7. Section 9-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) Every foundation grant contract and performing arts
grants program grant contract shall be monitored by the
foundation to ensure compliance with this part.
(b) Every foundation grant contract and performing arts
grants program grant contract shall be evaluated annually to
determine whether the grant attained the intended results in the
manner contemplated."
SECTION 8. Section 9-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[+]§9-17[+] Continued eligibility. Any recipient of a
foundation grant or performing arts grants program grant who
withholds or omits any material fact or deliberately
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO
■iiHiiiiHiinimii

Page 7 1815
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
misrepresents facts to the foundation shall be in violation of
this part. In addition to any other penalties provided by law,
any recipient found by the foundation to have violated this part
or the terms of its contract shall be prohibited from applying
for any foundation grant or performing arts grants program grant
for a period of five years from the date of termination."
SECTION 9. Section 9-18, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" ["tl §9-18 I^] Applicability and interpretation. This part
shall control all foundation grants and performing arts grants
program grants made by the foundation. This part shall be
liberally construed so as not to hinder or impede the
application, receipt, and use of federal moneys that may become
available to the State and the foundation. If unanticipated
federal moneys not included in the legislature's appropriation
to the foundation become available, the foundation, pursuant to
chapter 29, may apply for, receive, and expend the federal
moneys in accordance with the terms and conditions specified in
the applicable federal statutes, regulations, or financial award
documents."
PART II
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO
iiiinHiiMiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 10. Section 8-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
" (a) There shall be a commission to be known as the King
Kamehameha celebration commission placed within the department
of [accounting and gcno-ral oorvicoo] business, economic
development, and tourism for administrative purposes. The
commission shall consist of fifteen members to be appointed by
the governor in the manner provided by section 26-34. The
appointments shall be made from the following organizations,
with one member from each organization:
(1) Royal Order of Kamehameha I;
(2) ‘Ahahui Ka‘ahumanu;
(3) Hale 0 Na Ali'i 0 Hawai‘i ‘Ahahui Po'o;
(4) Daughters and Sons of Hawaiian Warriors Mamakakaua;
(5) Kamehameha Schools Alumni Association;
(6) Association of Hawaiian Civic Clubs;
(7) Waimanalo Hawaiian Homes Association;
(8) Daughters of Hawaii;
(9) Kapahulu Music Club; and
(10) Papakdlea Community Association.
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO


Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Each organization shall maintain a certificate of good
standing issued by the department of commerce and consumer
affairs and an active membership list. Each organization may
recommend for appointment to the commission persons capable of
providing administrative guidance to the commission with regard
to knowledge of Native Hawaiian culture, history and protocols,
legal issues, business, accounting, marketing, philanthropy, or
public relations.
In addition, the governor shall appoint one member to the
commission from each of the following islands: Kaua‘i, Lana‘i,
Maui, Moloka‘i, and Hawai‘i. Each of these members shall be a
resident of the respective island that the member represents.
The governor shall appoint persons capable of providing
administrative guidance with regard to legal issues, business,
accounting, marketing, philanthropy, or public relations."
2. By amending subsections (c) and (d) to read:
"(c) The members of the King Kamehameha celebration
commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be
entitled to reimbursement for travel and necessary expenses
while attending meetings and while in discharge of their duties.
The [comptroller] director of business, economic development,
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

Page 10
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
and tourism shall reimburse the members of the King Kamehameha
celebration commission for all necessary expenses incurred
during the discharge of their duties.
(d) The commission may appoint and dismiss an arts program
specialist and a part-time clerk typist, without regard to
chapter 76, who shall serve at the commission's pleasure, and
whose salaries shall be provided through fees, public
contributions, and private donations. The commission, by
majority vote, shall appoint an executive director who shall be
familiar with the people and culture of [ttawaiMrT-] the State, and
shall serve without regard to chapter 76 for a term to be
determined by the commission. Except for matters undertaken by
the [comptroller] director of business, economic development,
and tourism pursuant to subsection (f), the executive director
shall be responsible for all fiscal and administrative matters,
including securing public contributions and private foundation
grants or donations. The executive director shall also be
responsible for developing and administering programs as the
commission may direct. The executive director may be removed
for cause at any time by a two-thirds vote of all commission
members."
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO IC
l■nlnll^llilllllllllllll

Page 11
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
3. By amending subsection (f) to read:
"(f) The [-eofftpt-r-e-iire-r] director of business, economic
development, and tourism shall account for all moneys
appropriated by the legislature, may raise funds to defray
administrative costs, and may accept donations of money and
personal property on behalf of the commission; provided that all
donations accepted from private sources shall be expended in the
manner prescribed by the contributor, and all moneys received
from all sources shall be deposited into the commission's trust
account."
SECTION 11. Section 9-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) There is hereby created a state foundation on culture
and the arts, which shall be placed within the department of
[aGGeunting--and general ocrvicca] business, economic
development, and tourism for administrative purposes."
SECTION 12. Section 9-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§9-3 Duties. The foundation shall:
(1) Assist in coordinating the plans, programs, and
activities of individuals, associations, corporations,
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO 1
iminiiiiimiiiiiniiiiiiii

Page 12
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
and agencies concerned with the preservation and
furtherance of culture and the arts and history and
the humanities;
(2) Establish written standards and criteria by which
grant contracts shall be evaluated;
(3) Appraise the availability, adequacy, and accessibility
of culture and the arts and history and the humanities
to all persons throughout the State and devise
programs whereby culture and the arts and history and
the humanities can be brought to those who would
otherwise not have the opportunity to participate;
(4) Stimulate, guide, and promote culture and the arts and
history and the humanities throughout the State;
(5) Devise and recommend legislative and administrative
action for the preservation and furtherance of culture
and the arts and history and the humanities;
(6) Study the availability of private and governmental
grants for the promotion and furtherance of culture
and the arts and history and the humanities;
(7) Through its executive director:
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

illlillllHilllHIlIHM

Page 13
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(A) Administer funds allocated by grant, gift, or
bequest to the foundation; accept, hold,
disburse, and allocate funds that may become
available from other governmental and private
sources; provided that all those funds shall be
disbursed or allocated in compliance with any
specific designation stated by the donor and in
the absence of any designation, the funds shall
be disbursed or allocated for the promotion and
furtherance of culture and the arts and history
and the humanities; and
(B) Accept, hold, disburse, and allocate public funds
that are made available to the foundation by the
legislature for disbursement or allocation,
pursuant to the standards and procedures
established in part II, for the promotion and
furtherance of culture and the arts and history
and the humanities;
(8) Submit an annual report with recommendations to the
governor and legislature, prior to February 1, of each
year. Annual reports shall include the total number
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

■iMiiMiniMiiiniioii

Page 14 1815
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
and amount of gifts and other grants and income
received, payroll disbursements, contracts entered
into, and progress and accomplishments made during the
year, including the efforts of the Hawaii arts
education partners and its progress in implementing
the Hawaii arts education strategic plan and the
accomplishments of the art in public places and
relocatable works of art programs and the state art
museum;
(9) Convene the Hawaii arts education partners, which is
composed of the department of education, the colleges
of education and arts and humanities of the University
of Hawaii at Manoa, the Hawaii Association of
Independent Schools, and the Hawaii Arts Alliance
Art Education], to fully implement the terms of the
Hawaii arts education strategic plan;
(10) Display student art works in public buildings, sponsor
student art displays, promote arts education, and in
other ways encourage the development of creative
talent among the young people of [Hawaii;] the State;
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

iiiiiiniiRHiiiHinii

Page 15
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(11) In cooperation with qualified organizations, conduct
research, studies, and investigations in the fields of
ethnohistory and the humanities [-h] by:
(A) [MarkeT—publish/—and—distribute] Making,
publishing, and distributing works documenting
the contributions of individual ethnic groups in
their relationship to one another and to the
whole population' of [Hawaii; ] the State;
(B) [Place] Placing ethnohistorical and cultural
materials developed by the foundation or received
by the foundation as gifts and donations in
public archives, libraries, and other suitable
institutions accessible to the public; and
(C) [Maintain] Maintaining a register of the location
of [ouch] the materials;
(12) Cooperate with and assist the department of land and
natural resources and other state agencies in
developing and implementing programs relating to
historic preservation, research, restoration, and
presentation, as well as museum activities;
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO


Page 16 1815
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(13) Establish an individual artist fellowship program to
encourage artists to remain and work in [Hawairi] the
State and to reaffirm the importance of [Hawaii'□]
state artists and their cultural and economic
contributions to the State by:
(A) Recognizing and honoring [•Hawaii-’^] the State's
exceptionally talented visual and performing
artists for their outstanding work in and
commitment to the arts; and
(B) Enabling these artists to further their artistic
goals;
(14) In consultation with the [comptroller] director of
business, economic development, and tourism and
affected agencies and departments, administer the art
in public places and relocatable works of art programs
established pursuant to section 103-8.5; and
(15) Administer the operations of the state art museum
established pursuant to section 9-22."
SECTION 13. Section 9-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO 16
iiiHiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiniii

Page 17
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
" I-t]§9~5 [-}-] Rules. The foundation shall adopt rules in
consultation with the [comptroller] director of business,
economic development, and tourism for the purposes of
administering this chapter. [Such] The rules shall be adopted
in accordance with chapter 91."
SECTION 14. Section 26-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§26-6 Department of accounting and general services. (a)
The department of accounting and general services shall be
headed by a single executive to be known as the comptroller.
(b) The department shall:
(1) Preaudit and conduct after-the-fact audits of the
financial accounts of all state departments to
determine the legality of expenditures and the
accuracy of accounts;
(2) Report to the governor and to-each regular session of
the legislature as to the finances of each department
of the State;
(3) Administer the state risk management program;
(4) Establish and manage motor pools;
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

UINIIIIillllilllilUIIII

Page 18 1815
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(5) Manage the preservation and disposal of all records of
the State;
(6) Undertake the program of centralized engineering and
office leasing services, including operation and
maintenance and lease buyback processing pursuant to
subsection (d) of public buildings, for departments of
the State;
(7) Undertake the functions of the state surveyor;
(8) Establish accounting and internal control systems;
(9) Have the discretion to employ persons within the
comptroller's office who shall be exempt from chapters
76 and 89 in support of communications, change
management, and business process improvement programs
as part of the State's information technology
modernization efforts; provided that the persons shall
be members of the state employees' retirement system
and shall be eligible to receive the benefits of any
state employee benefit program generally applicable to
officers and employees of the State;
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

iniiiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiwiin

Page 19 1815
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(10) Provide centralized computer information management
and processing services through the chief information
officer;
(11) Establish a program to provide a means for public
access to public information and develop an
information network for state government;
(12) Assume administrative responsibility for the office of
information practices; and
(13) Approve state fleet acquisitions; provided that:
(A) Beginning January 1, 2022, all new light-duty
motor vehicles that are passenger cars purchased
for the State's fleet shall be zero-emission
vehicles;
(B) Beginning as soon as practicable but no later
than January 1, 2030, all new light-duty motor
vehicles that are multipurpose passenger vehicles
and trucks for the State's fleet shall be zero­
emission vehicles; and
(C) The comptroller may authorize an exemption for
new fleet vehicle purchases if zero-emission
vehicles are demonstrated to be cost-prohibitive
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO


Page 20
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
on a lifecycle basis or unsuitable for the
vehicles' planned purpose, or if funds are
unavailable.
For the purposes of this subsection:
"Light-duty motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined
in title 10 Code of Federal Regulations part 490.
"Multipurpose passenger vehicle" has the same meaning as
defined in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 571.3.
"Passenger car" has the same meaning as defined in title 49
Code of Federal Regulations section 571.3.
"Truck" has the same meaning as defined in title 49 Code of
Federal Regulations section 571.3.
"Zero-emission vehicle" has the same meaning as specified
in title 40 Code of Federal Regulations section 88.1.
(c) The state communication system shall be established
to:
(1) Facilitate implementation of the State's distributed
information processing and information resource
management plans;
(2) Improve data, voice, and video communications in state
government;
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO


Page 21
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Provide a means for connectivity among the state,
university, and county computer systems; and
(4) Provide a long-term means for public access to public
information.
(d) The department shall establish, coordinate, and manage
a program to facilitate facility agreements between the State
and private investors for the sale of facilities, excluding
facilities managed or controlled by the department of
transportation, to private investors; provided that each
facility agreement contains the following requirements:
(1) The State shall sell the facility to the private
investor, who shall:
(A) Renovate, improve, or construct a facility for
the State and may maintain the facility; and
(B) Lease the facility to the State, pursuant to a
building lease;
(2) The land upon which the facility rests shall not be
sold to the private investor; provided that the land
may be leased at a nominal rate to the private
investor for a term that would, at a minimum, allow
the private investor to recover the capital investment
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

■iiiiiiimnniiinm

Page 22
H.B. . .. N'a O.
g p
C.D. 1
that has been made to the facility, including
depreciation; and
(3) The State shall have the option of purchasing the
facility from the private investor for the remaining
balance of the debt service costs incurred by the
private investor at any time.
For purposes of this subsection:
"Building lease" means a contract between the department of
accounting and general services and a private investor in which
the private investor leases an improved facility to the
department for a specified period of time.
"Facility" means a building under the management and
control of any state department.
"Facility agreement" means an agreement between the State
and a private investor that, at a minimum, includes a
description of the work to be done, the sale price for the
facility, the duration of the agreement, the roles and
responsibilities of the State and the private investor, and the
terms and conditions for the lease.
"Private investor" means a nongovernmental entity.
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

IIIIIHMIIIIHIIIIMHII

Page 23
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(e) The department may adopt rules as may be necessary or
desirable for the operation and maintenance of public buildings;
for the operation and implementation of a program to provide a
means for public access to the State's information network
system and public information; and for the implementation of
facility agreements pursuant to subsection (d). The rules shall
be adopted pursuant to chapter 91.
[4^4-- The King KamohamGha colobration commission'shall be
piareed—the—depar^fement—a-eeeuftting^-aftd—gener^i—seTeviees-
for administrative purposes.--The—fa-net ions,—duties,—and-pewere-r
subject to the administrative control of the comptroller,—and
the -eompooition of the commission shall bo as—heretofore
previded-^y^—taw-r-
■4^] The functions and authority [heretaforo]
exercised by the comptroller, board of commissioners of public
archives, the archivist,, the disposal committee, and the
insurance management, surplus property management, and central
purchasing functions of the bureau of the budget and the
nonhighway functions of the department of public works as
[horotoforo] constituted [ane] shall be transferred to the
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

■HinniMiiiiHii

Page 24 H.B. NO. SS’i
C.D. 1
department of accounting and general services established by
this chapter.
[-(M-] (g) The department of accounting and general
services shall preserve and protect Washington Place, including
the grounds and the historic residence situated on its premises
at Miller and Beretania Streets in Honolulu. The department
shall administer, manage, operate, and maintain Washington Place
and the trust fund created under subsection [ (!) (h) .
[-Hd-j (h) There is established a trust fund in the state
treasury to be known as the Washington Place trust fund, into
which shall be deposited:
(1) All rents and fees collected for the use of Washington
Place and from activities conducted on the premises;
(2) All other money received for the fund from any other
source; and
(3) All income and interest earned or accrued on moneys
deposited into the trust fund.
All moneys deposited into the trust fund shall be expended
by the department of accounting and general services and used
exclusively to implement the provisions of subsection [(h),]
(g), including for staff salaries and fringe benefits, and shall
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO 2
IIIHIIIIIMIIIIHIinilIBHIIIII

Page 25 "
H.B. NO. h

C.D. 1
not be transferred, nor subject to transfer, to the general fund
or any other fund in the state treasury."
SECTION 15. Section 103-8.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsections (c) through (e) to read:
"(c) The one per cent amount, which is included in all
general obligation bond fund capital improvement appropriations,
shall be calculated at the time that each appropriation becomes
available. The [eempt-reiier^] director of business, economic
development, and tourism shall cause one per cent of each
general obligation bond fund capital improvement appropriation
designated for the construction or renovation of state buildings
to be transferred into a general obligation bond fund
appropriation the legislature may make specifically for deposits
to the works of art special fund after availability of moneys
from the appropriations. Each agency receiving capital
improvement appropriations shall calculate the one per cent
amount and transfer the appropriation into a general obligation
bond fund appropriation the legislature may make specifically
for deposits to the works of art special fund.
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

■liimiiinniuin

Page 26 1815
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(d) The [comptr-ellor] director of business, economic
development, and tourism and the state foundation on culture and
the arts shall decide on the specific art objects to acquire,
giving first consideration to placing appropriate pieces of art
at the locations of the original appropriation.
[?fee] Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, selection
of, commissioning artists for, reviewing of design, execution,
and placement of, and the acceptance of works of art shall be
the responsibility of the [comptr-o-1 l-er] director of business,
economic development, and tourism and the state foundation on
culture and the arts in consultation with the affected agency or
department.
Expenditures from the works of art special fund shall be
made by the [eemptaseite^^] director of business, economic
development, and tourism.
(e) The [-eempta^eiie^] director of business, economic
development, and tourism shall:
(1) Provide each agency receiving capital improvement
appropriations with information regarding items that
shall be included and excluded from the one per cent
amount;
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

iiiRniHiiinmniiMiH

Page 27 1815
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(2) Ensure that each agency calculates its one per cent
amount correctly;
(3) Ensure that each agency transfers the correct amount
of each appropriation to a separate appropriation made
for deposits to the works of art special fund; and
(4) Transfer to the works of art special fund the annual
transfer amount, as defined in subsection (i), from an
appropriation the legislature may make for deposits to
the works of art special fund."
2. By amending subsection (h) to read:
"(h) The [comptroller] director of business, economic
development, and tourism and the executive director of the state
foundation on culture and the arts shall track amounts
transferred to the works of art special fund, the use of all
transferred amounts, and the timing of the use of all
transferred amounts by appropriation and date of transfer."
SECTION 16. All appropriations, records, equipment,
machines, files, supplies, contracts, books, papers, documents,
maps, and other personal property heretofore made, used,
acquired, or held by the department of accounting and general
services relating to the functions transferred to the department
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

iiiniiMiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 28 ■ ■ ik i1815
H.B. NO.
HD1
C.D. 1
of business, economic development, and tourism shall be
transferred with the functions to which they relate.
SECTION 17. All rights, powers, functions, and duties of
the department of accounting and general services relating to
the functions transferred to the department of business,
economic development, and tourism shall be transferred with the
functions to which they relate.
All officers and employees whose functions are transferred
by this Act shall be transferred with their functions and shall
continue to perform their regular duties upon their transfer,
subject to the state personnel laws and this Act.
No officer or employee of the State having tenure shall
suffer any loss of salary, seniority, prior service credit,
vacation, sick leave, or other employee benefit or privilege as
a consequence of this Act, and the officer or employee may be
transferred or appointed to a civil service position without the
necessity of examination; provided that the officer or employee
possesses the minimum qualifications for the position to which
transferred or appointed; provided further that subsequent
changes in status may be made pursuant to applicable civil
service and compensation laws.
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO 2
iiiHnniniiiiiiiiniiii

Page 29
H.B. NO. -'1
C.D. 1
An officer or employee of the State who does not have
tenure and who may be transferred or appointed to a civil
service position as a consequence of this Act shall become a
civil service employee without the loss of salary, seniority,
prior service credit, vacation, sick leave, or other employee
benefits or privileges and without the necessity of examination;
provided that the officer or employee possesses the minimum
qualifications for the position to which transferred or
appointed.
If an office or position held by an officer or employee
having tenure is abolished, the officer or employee shall not
thereby be separated from public employment, but shall remain in
the employment of the State with the same pay and classification
and shall be transferred to some other office or position for
which the officer or employee is eligible under the personnel
laws of the State as determined by the head of the department or
the governor.
SECTION 18. All rules, policies, procedures, guidelines,
and other material adopted or developed by the department of
accounting and general services to implement provisions of the
Hawaii Revised Statutes that are reenacted or made applicable to
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO 2
iHiffliiiiniiniiiiiiii

Page 30
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the department of business, economic development, and tourism by
this Act shall remain in full force and effect until amended or
repealed by the department of business, economic development,
and tourism pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
In the interim, every reference to the department of
accounting and general services or comptroller in those rules,
policies, procedures, guidelines, and other material is amended
to refer to the department of business, economic development,
and tourism or director of business, economic development, and
tourism, as appropriate.
SECTION 19. All deeds, leases, contracts, loans,
agreements, permits, or other documents executed or entered into
by or on behalf of the department of accounting and general
services, pursuant to the provisions of the Hawaii Revised
Statutes that are reenacted or made applicable to the department
of business, economic development, and tourism by this Act shall
remain in full force and effect. Upon the effective date of
this Act, every reference to the department of accounting and
general services or the comptroller therein shall be construed
as a reference to the department of business, economic
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

iiiiniiiiiiiiiinninniR

Page 31
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
development, and tourism or the director of business, economic
development, and tourism, as appropriate.
SECTION 20. All appropriations, records, equipment,
machines, files, supplies, contracts, books, papers, documents,
maps, and other personal property heretofore made, used,
acquired, or held by the department of accounting and general
services relating to the functions transferred to the department
of business, economic development, and tourism shall be
transferred with the functions to which they relate.
PART III
SECTION 21. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 22. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3210 HB1815 CDl HMSO

MfflMmiiniiM

1815
H.B. NO
APPROVED this 8th day of June ,2026
±
w
d
a
o
Q
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1815, HD 1,SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1815, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
113-26